Hawaii statutes.
[§393-22] Exemption of followers of certain
teachings or beliefs. This chapter shall not apply to any individual who
pursuant to the teachings, faith, or belief of any group, depends for healing
upon prayer or other spiritual means. [L 1974, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next